Nebraska, session 109, LB165.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB165 LB165
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The governing body of a municipality or county may
authorize, by ordinance or resolution, a syringe services program to
operate within the bounds of such municipality or county. A county
ordinance or resolution shall not be effective within the corporate
boundaries of any incorporated municipality located in whole or in part
within the county.
(2) A syringe services program authorized by this section shall, at
a minimum, offer or arrange for the provision of the following:
(a) A needs assessment for program participants;
(b) Access to sterile syringes, needles, and other items or
equipment used to reduce the risk of disease transmission or other harm;
(c) Safe disposal of used syringes, needles, and other items or
equipment;
(d) Referral information and educational materials regarding
substance use disorder prevention and treatment;
(e) Information to reduce injection and overdose risks;
(f) Naloxone or information about where naloxone can be obtained at
low or no cost; and
(g) Referral information and educational materials regarding social
services, mental health care, and other health care services.
(3) A syringe services program authorized by this section shall not
be located within five hundred feet of any:
(a) Public or private: Child care facility; elementary, vocational,
or secondary school; or youth center; or
(b) Public: Community recreation center, library, or swimming pool.
(4) A syringe services program authorized by this section shall only
provide services to individuals eighteen years of age or older.
Sec. 2. Section 28-441, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-441 (1) It shall be unlawful for any person to use, or to possess
with intent to use, drug paraphernalia to manufacture, inject, ingest,
-2-

LB165 LB165
2025 2025
inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body a controlled substance
in violation of sections 28-101, 28-431, and 28-439 to 28-444.
(2) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of an
infraction.
(3) A person shall not be in violation of this section if section
28-472 or 28-1701 applies.
(4) This section does not apply to:
(a) The staff of a syringe services program authorized by section 1
of this act when such staff are engaged in the provision, retrieval, or
disposal of syringes, needles, or other items or equipment in connection
with the program; or
(b) A participant of such a program when the participant is engaged
in the retrieval or disposal of syringes, needles, or other items or
equipment at or within the immediate vicinity of the program site or
facility.
Sec. 3. Section 28-442, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
28-442 (1) It shall be unlawful for any person to deliver, possess
with intent to deliver, or manufacture with intent to deliver, drug
paraphernalia, knowing, or under circumstances in which one reasonably
should know, that it will be used to manufacture, inject, ingest, or
inhale or otherwise be used to introduce into the human body a controlled
substance in violation of sections 28-101, 28-431, and 28-439 to 28-444.
(2) This section shall not apply to:
(a) Pharmacists pharmacists, pharmacist interns, pharmacy
technicians, and pharmacy clerks who sell hypodermic syringes or needles
for the prevention of the spread of infectious diseases; .
(b) The staff of a syringe services program authorized by section 1
of this act when such staff are engaged in the provision, retrieval, or
disposal of syringes, needles, or other items or equipment in connection
with the program; or
-3-

LB165 LB165
2025 2025
(c) A participant of such a program when the participant is engaged
in the retrieval or disposal of syringes, needles, or other items or
equipment at or within the immediate vicinity of the program site or
facility.
(3) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class
II misdemeanor.
Sec. 4. Original sections 28-441 and 28-442, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-4-